Washington statutes.
RCW 43.135.060

Prohibition of new or extended programs without full reimbursement—Transfer of programs—Determination of costs.

(1) After July 1, 1995, the legislature shall not impose responsibility for new programs or increased levels of service under existing programs on any political subdivision of the state unless the subdivision is fully reimbursed by the state for the costs of the new programs or increases in service levels. Reimbursement by the state may be made by: (a) A specific appropriation; or (b) increases in state distributions of revenue to political subdivisions occurring after January 1, 1998.

(2) If by order of any court, or legislative enactment, the costs of a federal or local government program are transferred to or from the state, the otherwise applicable state expenditure limit shall be increased or decreased, as the case may be, by the dollar amount of the costs of the program.

(3) The legislature, in consultation with the office of financial management or its successor agency, shall determine the costs of any new programs or increased levels of service under existing programs imposed on any political subdivision or transferred to or from the state.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the costs incurred for voting devices or machines under RCW 29A.12.150.

[ 2015 c 53 s 71; 1998 c 321 s 15 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3, 1998); 1994 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 601, approved November 2, 1993); 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 601; 1990 c 184 s 2; 1980 c 1 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 62, approved November 6, 1979).]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—1998 c 321: See notes following RCW 82.14.045.

Effective dates—Application—1998 c 321 ss 1-21, 44, and 45: See note following RCW 82.14.045.

Referral to electorate—1998 c 321 ss 1-21 and 44-46: See note following RCW 82.14.045.

Severability—1990 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 82.14.300.

Local government reimbursement claims: RCW 4.92.280.